test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VW_NoExtra_anini_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     anini: anini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1anini: nianini
     +Px2anini: gianini
     +Px3anini: oanini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     anini+Dim: aniniens
     anini+Con: aninienh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     anini+Pos: aniniim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     anini+Pej: aniniish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     anini+Pos1Pl: aniniinaan
     anini+PosPl: aniniiwaa
     anini+PosObv: aniniini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     anini+Pret: aniniiban
     anini+VocPl: anini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     anini+Obv: aninian
     anini+Pl: aniniag
     anini+Loc: aniniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1anini+Dim: nianiniens
     +Px1anini+Con: nianinienh
     +Px2anini+Dim: gianiniens
     +Px2anini+Con: gianinienh
     +Px3anini+Dim: oaniniens
     +Px3anini+Con: oaninienh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1anini+Pos: nianiniim
     +Px2anini+Pos: gianiniim
     +Px3anini+Pos: oaniniim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1anini+Pej: nianiniish
     +Px2anini+Pej: gianiniish
     +Px3anini+Pej: oaniniish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1anini+Pos1Pl: nianiniinaan
     +Px1anini+PosPl: nianiniiwaa
     +Px1anini+PosObv: nianiniini
     +Px2anini+Pos1Pl: gianiniinaan
     +Px2anini+PosPl: gianiniiwaa
     +Px2anini+PosObv: gianiniini
     +Px3anini+Pos1Pl: oaniniinaan
     +Px3anini+PosPl: oaniniiwaa
     +Px3anini+PosObv: oaniniini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1anini+Pret: nianiniiban
     +Px1anini+VocPl: nianini***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Pret: gianiniiban
     +Px2anini+VocPl: gianini***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Pret: oaniniiban
     +Px3anini+VocPl: oanini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1anini+Obv: nianinian
     +Px1anini+Pl: nianiniag
     +Px1anini+Loc: nianiniing
     +Px2anini+Obv: gianinian
     +Px2anini+Pl: gianiniag
     +Px2anini+Loc: gianiniing
     +Px3anini+Obv: oaninian
     +Px3anini+Pl: oaniniag
     +Px3anini+Loc: oaniniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     anini+Dim+Pos: aniniensim
     anini+Con+Pos: aninienhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     anini+Dim+Pej: aniniensish
     anini+Con+Pej: aninienhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     anini+Dim+Pos1Pl: aniniensinaan
     anini+Dim+PosPl: aniniensiwaa
     anini+Dim+PosObv: aniniensini
     anini+Con+Pos1Pl: aninienhinaan
     anini+Con+PosPl: aninienhiwaa
     anini+Con+PosObv: aninienhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     anini+Dim+Pret: aniniensiban
     anini+Dim+VocPl: aniniens***idig, idog***
     anini+Con+Pret: aninienhiban
     anini+Con+VocPl: aninienh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     anini+Dim+Obv: aniniensan
     anini+Dim+Pl: aniniensag
     anini+Dim+Loc: aniniensing
     anini+Con+Obv: aninienhan
     anini+Con+Pl: aninienhag
     anini+Con+Loc: aninienhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     anini+Pos+Pej: aniniimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     anini+Pos+Pos1Pl: aniniiminaan
     anini+Pos+PosPl: aniniimiwaa
     anini+Pos+PosObv: aniniimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     anini+Pos+Pret: aniniimiban
     anini+Pos+VocPl: aniniim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     anini+Pos+Obv: aniniiman
     anini+Pos+Pl: aniniimag
     anini+Pos+Loc: aniniiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     anini+Pej+Pos1Pl: aniniishinaan
     anini+Pej+PosPl: aniniishiwaa
     anini+Pej+PosObv: aniniishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     anini+Pej+Pret: aniniishiban
     anini+Pej+VocPl: aniniish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     anini+Pej+Obv: aniniishan
     anini+Pej+Pl: aniniishag
     anini+Pej+Loc: aniniishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     anini+Pos1Pl+Pret: aniniinaaniban
     anini+Pos1Pl+VocPl: aniniinaan***idig, idog***
     anini+PosPl+Pret: aniniiwaaiban
     anini+PosPl+VocPl: aniniiwaa***idig, idog***
     anini+PosObv+Pret: aniniiniiban
     anini+PosObv+VocPl: aniniini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     anini+Pos1Pl+Obv: aniniinaanan
     anini+Pos1Pl+Pl: aniniinaanag
     anini+Pos1Pl+Loc: aniniinaaning
     anini+PosPl+Obv: aniniiwaaan
     anini+PosPl+Pl: aniniiwaaag
     anini+PosPl+Loc: aniniiwaaing
     anini+PosObv+Obv: aniniinian
     anini+PosObv+Pl: aniniiniag
     anini+PosObv+Loc: aniniiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     anini+Pret+Obv: aniniibanan
     anini+Pret+Pl: aniniibanag
     anini+Pret+Loc: aniniibaning
     anini+VocPl+Obv: anini***idig, idog***an
     anini+VocPl+Pl: anini***idig, idog***ag
     anini+VocPl+Loc: anini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos: nianiniensim
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos: nianinienhim
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos: gianiniensim
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos: gianinienhim
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos: oaniniensim
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos: oaninienhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pej: nianiniensish
     +Px1anini+Con+Pej: nianinienhish
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pej: gianiniensish
     +Px2anini+Con+Pej: gianinienhish
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pej: oaniniensish
     +Px3anini+Con+Pej: oaninienhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos1Pl: nianiniensinaan
     +Px1anini+Dim+PosPl: nianiniensiwaa
     +Px1anini+Dim+PosObv: nianiniensini
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos1Pl: nianinienhinaan
     +Px1anini+Con+PosPl: nianinienhiwaa
     +Px1anini+Con+PosObv: nianinienhini
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos1Pl: gianiniensinaan
     +Px2anini+Dim+PosPl: gianiniensiwaa
     +Px2anini+Dim+PosObv: gianiniensini
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos1Pl: gianinienhinaan
     +Px2anini+Con+PosPl: gianinienhiwaa
     +Px2anini+Con+PosObv: gianinienhini
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos1Pl: oaniniensinaan
     +Px3anini+Dim+PosPl: oaniniensiwaa
     +Px3anini+Dim+PosObv: oaniniensini
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos1Pl: oaninienhinaan
     +Px3anini+Con+PosPl: oaninienhiwaa
     +Px3anini+Con+PosObv: oaninienhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pret: nianiniensiban
     +Px1anini+Dim+VocPl: nianiniens***idig, idog***
     +Px1anini+Con+Pret: nianinienhiban
     +Px1anini+Con+VocPl: nianinienh***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pret: gianiniensiban
     +Px2anini+Dim+VocPl: gianiniens***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Con+Pret: gianinienhiban
     +Px2anini+Con+VocPl: gianinienh***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pret: oaniniensiban
     +Px3anini+Dim+VocPl: oaniniens***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Con+Pret: oaninienhiban
     +Px3anini+Con+VocPl: oaninienh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1anini+Dim+Obv: nianiniensan
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pl: nianiniensag
     +Px1anini+Dim+Loc: nianiniensing
     +Px1anini+Con+Obv: nianinienhan
     +Px1anini+Con+Pl: nianinienhag
     +Px1anini+Con+Loc: nianinienhing
     +Px2anini+Dim+Obv: gianiniensan
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pl: gianiniensag
     +Px2anini+Dim+Loc: gianiniensing
     +Px2anini+Con+Obv: gianinienhan
     +Px2anini+Con+Pl: gianinienhag
     +Px2anini+Con+Loc: gianinienhing
     +Px3anini+Dim+Obv: oaniniensan
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pl: oaniniensag
     +Px3anini+Dim+Loc: oaniniensing
     +Px3anini+Con+Obv: oaninienhan
     +Px3anini+Con+Pl: oaninienhag
     +Px3anini+Con+Loc: oaninienhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1anini+Pos+Pej: nianiniimish
     +Px2anini+Pos+Pej: gianiniimish
     +Px3anini+Pos+Pej: oaniniimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1anini+Pos+Pos1Pl: nianiniiminaan
     +Px1anini+Pos+PosPl: nianiniimiwaa
     +Px1anini+Pos+PosObv: nianiniimini
     +Px2anini+Pos+Pos1Pl: gianiniiminaan
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosPl: gianiniimiwaa
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosObv: gianiniimini
     +Px3anini+Pos+Pos1Pl: oaniniiminaan
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosPl: oaniniimiwaa
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosObv: oaniniimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1anini+Pos+Pret: nianiniimiban
     +Px1anini+Pos+VocPl: nianiniim***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Pos+Pret: gianiniimiban
     +Px2anini+Pos+VocPl: gianiniim***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Pos+Pret: oaniniimiban
     +Px3anini+Pos+VocPl: oaniniim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1anini+Pos+Obv: nianiniiman
     +Px1anini+Pos+Pl: nianiniimag
     +Px1anini+Pos+Loc: nianiniiming
     +Px2anini+Pos+Obv: gianiniiman
     +Px2anini+Pos+Pl: gianiniimag
     +Px2anini+Pos+Loc: gianiniiming
     +Px3anini+Pos+Obv: oaniniiman
     +Px3anini+Pos+Pl: oaniniimag
     +Px3anini+Pos+Loc: oaniniiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1anini+Pej+Pos1Pl: nianiniishinaan
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosPl: nianiniishiwaa
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosObv: nianiniishini
     +Px2anini+Pej+Pos1Pl: gianiniishinaan
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosPl: gianiniishiwaa
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosObv: gianiniishini
     +Px3anini+Pej+Pos1Pl: oaniniishinaan
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosPl: oaniniishiwaa
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosObv: oaniniishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1anini+Pej+Pret: nianiniishiban
     +Px1anini+Pej+VocPl: nianiniish***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Pej+Pret: gianiniishiban
     +Px2anini+Pej+VocPl: gianiniish***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Pej+Pret: oaniniishiban
     +Px3anini+Pej+VocPl: oaniniish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     +Px1anini+Pej+Obv: nianiniishan
     +Px1anini+Pej+Pl: nianiniishag
     +Px1anini+Pej+Loc: nianiniishing
     +Px2anini+Pej+Obv: gianiniishan
     +Px2anini+Pej+Pl: gianiniishag
     +Px2anini+Pej+Loc: gianiniishing
     +Px3anini+Pej+Obv: oaniniishan
     +Px3anini+Pej+Pl: oaniniishag
     +Px3anini+Pej+Loc: oaniniishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     +Px1anini+Pos1Pl+Pret: nianiniinaaniban
     +Px1anini+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nianiniinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1anini+PosPl+Pret: nianiniiwaaiban
     +Px1anini+PosPl+VocPl: nianiniiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1anini+PosObv+Pret: nianiniiniiban
     +Px1anini+PosObv+VocPl: nianiniini***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Pos1Pl+Pret: gianiniinaaniban
     +Px2anini+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gianiniinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+PosPl+Pret: gianiniiwaaiban
     +Px2anini+PosPl+VocPl: gianiniiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+PosObv+Pret: gianiniiniiban
     +Px2anini+PosObv+VocPl: gianiniini***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Pos1Pl+Pret: oaniniinaaniban
     +Px3anini+Pos1Pl+VocPl: oaniniinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+PosPl+Pret: oaniniiwaaiban
     +Px3anini+PosPl+VocPl: oaniniiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+PosObv+Pret: oaniniiniiban
     +Px3anini+PosObv+VocPl: oaniniini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     +Px1anini+Pos1Pl+Obv: nianiniinaanan
     +Px1anini+Pos1Pl+Pl: nianiniinaanag
     +Px1anini+Pos1Pl+Loc: nianiniinaaning
     +Px1anini+PosPl+Obv: nianiniiwaaan
     +Px1anini+PosPl+Pl: nianiniiwaaag
     +Px1anini+PosPl+Loc: nianiniiwaaing
     +Px1anini+PosObv+Obv: nianiniinian
     +Px1anini+PosObv+Pl: nianiniiniag
     +Px1anini+PosObv+Loc: nianiniiniing
     +Px2anini+Pos1Pl+Obv: gianiniinaanan
     +Px2anini+Pos1Pl+Pl: gianiniinaanag
     +Px2anini+Pos1Pl+Loc: gianiniinaaning
     +Px2anini+PosPl+Obv: gianiniiwaaan
     +Px2anini+PosPl+Pl: gianiniiwaaag
     +Px2anini+PosPl+Loc: gianiniiwaaing
     +Px2anini+PosObv+Obv: gianiniinian
     +Px2anini+PosObv+Pl: gianiniiniag
     +Px2anini+PosObv+Loc: gianiniiniing
     +Px3anini+Pos1Pl+Obv: oaniniinaanan
     +Px3anini+Pos1Pl+Pl: oaniniinaanag
     +Px3anini+Pos1Pl+Loc: oaniniinaaning
     +Px3anini+PosPl+Obv: oaniniiwaaan
     +Px3anini+PosPl+Pl: oaniniiwaaag
     +Px3anini+PosPl+Loc: oaniniiwaaing
     +Px3anini+PosObv+Obv: oaniniinian
